Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,105
Authority to amend.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles or to delete a provision not required in the articles. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 105.